Washington statutes.
RCW 4.20.020

Wrongful death—Beneficiaries of action.

Every action under RCW 4.20.010 shall be for the benefit of the spouse, state registered domestic partner, child or children, including stepchildren, of the person whose death shall have been so caused. If there is no spouse, state registered domestic partner, or such child or children, such action may be maintained for the benefit of the parents or siblings of the deceased.

In every such action the trier of fact may give such damages as, under all circumstances of the case, may to them seem just.

[ 2019 c 159 s 2; 2011 c 336 s 90; 2007 c 156 s 29; 1985 c 139 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 2; 1917 c 123 s 2; RRS s 183-1.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—2019 c 159: See note following RCW 4.20.010.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.